Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-1,109
Chief executive officer; good time; report; Director of Correctional Services; duties.

The chief executive officer of a facility shall regularly report all good time and all forfeitures, withholdings, and restorations of good time to the director. On the basis of such report, the director shall inform the board of all committed offenders who are expected to become eligible for release on parole within the next three months.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 40, p. 3093;

Laws 1975, LB 567, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 816, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 38;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 151.

Sentencing judge's announcement he considered possible effect of statutes permitting prison authorities to ameliorate sentences did not violate constitutional due process, and sentences were not excessive. State v. Houston, 196 Neb. 724, 246 N.W.2d 63 (1976).

Prisoner's statutory right to good time may not be taken away from him without following minimum appropriate due process procedures. Wolff v. McDonnell, 418 U.S. 539 (1974).